Illinois, session 104th, HB5177.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Aligning Recommendations with Children's Actual Clinical and 6Emergency Needs and Determinations (ARC-ACEND) Act. 7    Section 5. Legislative findings and purpose. The General 8Assembly finds that: 9        (1) Children with serious medical conditions require 10    continuity of care, clinically informed decision-making, 11    and stability in their day-to-day care and management. 12        (2) Guardians ad litem, child representatives, 13    evaluators, and mediators often lack specialized medical 14    training and may make recommendations that inadvertently 15    conflict with a child's clinical needs. 16        (3) Courts must have access to reliable medical 17    information when determining parenting time, 18    decision-making, and other matters affecting such 19    children. 20        (4) It is contrary to the medical best interests of a 21    child with a serious or potentially serious medical or 22    behavioral health condition to be separated from a safe 23    parent who is primarily or predominantly responsible for   HB5177- 2 -LRB104 20165 JRC 33616 b1    the child's daily medical care, monitoring, or condition 2    management. 3        (5) Ensuring that all recommendations and orders are 4    consistent with a child's clinical needs is essential to 5    protecting child safety and welfare. 6        (6) The purpose of this Act is to ensure that family 7    court decisions affecting medically vulnerable children 8    are grounded in qualified medical judgment and that no 9    child is placed at clinical risk because of uninformed or 10    inconsistent recommendations. 11    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 12    "Medical consistency" means full alignment with the 13child's clinical needs and medical best interests as 14determined by a qualified medical provider. 15    "Protective parent" means a parent who consistently 16undertakes, in good faith, to shield the child from 17involvement in parental disputes and age-inappropriate 18matters; keeps the child physically safe, provided for, and 19emotionally and physically healthy; and who does not seek to 20employ the child as a form of leverage in any dispute between 21the parents. 22    "Provisional recommendation" means any recommendation made 23by a guardian ad litem, child representative, evaluator, 24mediator, or other court-appointed officer that has not yet 25been certified as clinically consistent under Section 15.   HB5177- 3 -LRB104 20165 JRC 33616 b1    "Qualified medical provider" means the child's primary 2care physician or specialist, if available, or another 3licensed physician or licensed behavioral health specialist 4physician with sufficient knowledge of the child's condition, 5who may consult with specialist providers as appropriate. 6Advanced practice registered nurses, counselors and therapists 7do not meet this definition. 8    "Safe parent" is designated as a "safe parent" if and only 9if the parent meets all of the following criteria: 10        (1) does not neglect or abuse the child; 11        (2) does not abuse the other parent; 12        (3) has not previously neglected or abused the child 13    or the other parent, absent a positive assessment, on the 14    record, by a qualified physician who has been the abuser's 15    primary behavioral health provider for at least one year, 16    based on specific and articulable facts, that all of the 17    following are true: 18            (A) the abuse was the result of a behavioral 19        health disorder or psychological or neurological 20        condition; 21            (B) the abuser has successfully completed 22        treatment or is satisfactorily complying with ongoing 23        or indefinite treatment, with at least a 12-month 24        unbroken history of such compliance; and25            (C) the abuse is unlikely to continue or to recur; 26        (4) is judged by court-appointed officers, acting as   HB5177- 4 -LRB104 20165 JRC 33616 b1    required by this Act, to be capable of safely interacting 2    with and caring for the child without supervision; 3        (5) is not the respondent to any order of protection, 4    presently in effect, which is sustained after a hearing; 5        (6) is not under the care of a mental health provider 6    for a serious behavioral, psychological, or emotional 7    condition that the court, in consultation with the 8    diagnosing provider, deems to pose a potential risk to the 9    child; and 10        (7) is a protective parent. 11    "Serious medical condition" means any chronic, acute, or 12clinically significant physical or behavioral condition 13requiring ongoing monitoring, specialized care, or adherence 14to a treatment plan, including but not limited to Type 1 15Diabetes, cystic fibrosis, epilepsy, asthma, major depressive 16disorder, anxiety disorders, eating disorders, autism spectrum 17disorder, ADHD, serious physical injury, or other conditions 18identified by a qualified medical provider.  19    Section 15. Medical consistency certification requirement. 20    (a) When a child who is the subject of a custody or 21parenting-time dispute has a serious medical condition, all 22recommendations made by a guardian ad litem, child 23representative, evaluator, mediator, or other court-appointed 24officer shall be deemed provisional until certified under 25subsection (b).   HB5177- 5 -LRB104 20165 JRC 33616 b1    (b) A provisional recommendation may not be considered by 2the court for purposes of entering a temporary or final order 3unless a qualified medical provider certifies, in writing, 4that the recommendation is consistent with the child's 5clinical needs and medical best interests. 6    (c) The qualified medical provider may consult with 7specialist providers involved in the child's care before 8issuing certification. 9    (d) The court may not adopt, rely upon, or give weight to 10any provisional recommendation before certification, except to 11maintain the child's existing care arrangements necessary to 12ensure safety and continuity of treatment. 13    (e) The court shall provide reasonably sufficient time for 14qualified medical providers to make assessments and 15recommendations and err on the side of caution with regard to 16any interim instruction or temporary arrangement without 17regard for considerations including, but not limited to, 18generalized notions of coparenting balance. In all decisions, 19the safety and medical consistency of the child is paramount. 20    Section 20. Modification of inconsistent recommendations. 21    (a)(1) If a qualified medical provider determines that a 22provisional recommendation is not consistent with the child's 23clinical needs or medical best interests, the recommendation 24must be modified to at least to the minimum extent necessary to 25achieve consistency per the recommendations of the qualified   HB5177- 6 -LRB104 20165 JRC 33616 b1medical provider. 2    (2) Nothing in this subsection may be construed to limit 3the court's authority to order additional or more protective 4modifications if consistent with the child's clinical needs or 5medical best interests, but the court may not impose less 6protective measures or measures inconsistent with the 7physician's recommendations. 8    (3) If the court alters the recommended modifications of 9the qualified medical provider, it shall rule in writing and 10specify the reasons for the alteration. The qualified medical 11provider and the child's primary caregiver shall then be 12afforded an opportunity to respond before the order becomes 13final. 14    (b)(1) Medical consistency for children with a serious 15medical condition supersedes all other considerations, 16including, but not limited to, geography, parental 17preferences, logistical convenience or feasibility, or 18generalized notions of coparenting balance. 19    (2) No factor that would otherwise weigh against 20modification may be given weight if doing so would result in a 21recommendation or order that is not fully consistent with the 22child's clinical needs or medical best interests as stipulated 23by the qualified medical provider. 24    Section 25. Presumption regarding safe primary caregiver. 25    (a)(1) For any child with a serious medical condition, it   HB5177- 7 -LRB104 20165 JRC 33616 b1is per se contrary to the child's medical best interests to be 2separated from a safe parent who is primarily or predominantly 3responsible for the child's day-to-day condition-related care, 4monitoring, or condition management. 5    (2) This rule applies universally in all cases in which 6maintaining contact with the safe, caregiving parent is in any 7way an option, including, but not limited to, cases involving 8deportation, visa expiration, work reassignment or transfer, 9or other nonelective or effectively nonelective relocation. 10    (b) This presumption may be rebutted only by clear and 11convincing evidence supported by qualified medical testimony 12that separation is medically necessary for the child's safety 13or clinical well-being. 14    (c) A parent's role as the primary medical caregiver may 15not be used to infer gatekeeping, alienation, or obstruction 16absent independent evidence of bad-faith conduct.